Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Medical Practice

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Veterinarian's liability for malpractice, 71 ALR4th 811.

§ 33-30-201.
Citation and purpose of article.

This act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

] shall be known as the Wyoming Veterinary Medical Practice Act.

It is hereby declared that the practice of veterinary medicine is a privilege which is granted by legislative authority in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, and to assure the public of the highest competency and professional standards by persons licensed to practice veterinary medicine.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.1.

§ 33-30-202.
Definitions.

When used in this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

], these words and phrases, unless the context otherwise indicates, shall be defined as follows:

“Animal” is any animal other than man and includes fowl, birds, fish and reptiles, wild or domestic, living or dead;

“Veterinary medicine” is that discipline of medicine, system, science and art devoted to preventing or alleviating illness, pain, disease and deformity of animals by diagnosing, treating, prescribing or operating, and to preventing the spread to human beings of those diseases capable of being contracted by human beings from animals, utilizing means and methods which are taught and practiced in accredited colleges of veterinary medicine. Veterinary dentistry, cosmetic surgery and physiological examination of animals shall be considered a part of veterinary medicine;

“Practice of veterinary medicine” shall include, but not be limited to, the practice:

To diagnose, prognose, treat, correct, change, relieve, or prevent disease, pain, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental conditions of any animal for a fee or other compensation; including the prescription or administration of any drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, application, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique;

To physiologically examine or to correct sterility or infertility, or to render advice or recommendation with regard to any of the above for any animal for a fee or other compensation;

To represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability and willingness to do any act described in paragraphs (A) and (B);

To use any titles, words, abbreviations, or letters in a manner or under circumstances which induce the belief that the person using them is qualified to do any act described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph except where such person is a veterinarian.

“Veterinarian” means a person who has received a doctor’s degree in veterinary medicine from an accredited college of veterinary medicine;

“Licensed veterinarian” means a person who is validly and currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state. For the purpose of this act such licensed veterinarian is also considered to be a practicing veterinarian;

“College of veterinary medicine” means any veterinary college or school or division of a university or college that offers the degree, doctor of veterinary medicine or its equivalent, and that conforms to the standards required for accreditation by the American Veterinary Medical Association;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, association, joint venture, cooperative and corporation, or any other group or combination acting in concert; and whether or not acting as a principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or as any other kind of legal or personal representative, or as the successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant, employee, director, officer, or any other representative of such person;

“Board” means the Wyoming board of veterinary medicine;

“Animal health emergency” means any event or situation involving animal disease or animal welfare that threatens public welfare and the viability of animal industries, including, but not limited to, incursion of foreign animal disease, natural disaster and bioterrorism;

“Animal euthanasia technician” means a person who is employed or sponsored by a law enforcement agency whose duties include euthanizing an unwanted, sick, injured or dangerous domestic animal;

“Euthanasia” means the act or practice of providing a humane death for an animal.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.2; 2011, ch. 97, § 1; 2013 ch. 127, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment,

added (a)(ix).

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(x) and (a)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-30-203.
License required; exceptions.

No person may practice veterinary medicine in the state who is not a licensed veterinarian or the holder of a valid temporary permit issued by the board. This act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

] shall not be construed to prohibit:

An employed veterinarian of the federal, state, or local government from performing his official duties; provided, however, this exemption shall not apply to such person when he is not engaged in carrying out his official duties;

A person who is a regular student in a college of veterinary medicine from performing duties or action assigned by his instructors, or from working under the responsible supervision of a licensed veterinarian during a school vacation period;

A veterinarian regularly licensed in another state from consulting with a licensed veterinarian in this state;

Any merchant or manufacturer from selling at his regular place of business medicines, feed, appliances, or other products used in the prevention or treatment of animal diseases;

The owner of an animal, the owner’s employees or any livestock operator and such operator’s employees with whom the owner exchanges work and assistance in connection with animals, from caring for and treating any animal belonging to such owner, in any manner desired by said owner;

A member of the faculty of an accredited college of veterinary medicine or a recognized division of veterinary science from performing his regular functions at such college or division by lecturing, or from giving instructions or demonstrations at such college or division or in connection with a continuing education course or seminar;

Any person from engaging in bona fide scientific research which requires experimentation involving animals; providing that procurement and care of such experimental animals shall conform to accepted methods and existing law;

Any person approved by the board from performing artificial insemination of animals as provided by W.S. 33-30-204(m)(iii);

Any veterinary aide, nurse, laboratory technician, intern, or other employee of a licensed veterinarian from administering medication or rendering auxiliary or supporting assistance under the responsible supervision of such practicing veterinarian;

Persons from gratuitously giving aid, assistance or relief in emergency or accident cases if they do not represent themselves to be veterinarians or use any title or degree appertaining to the practice thereof;

Any person approved by the board from performing embryo transplants upon animals as provided by W.S. 33-30-204(m)(xiii);

Any person who, without expectation of compensation, provides emergency veterinary care at the site in an emergency or disaster situation;

The state veterinarian from deputizing licensed veterinarians to assist as deputy state veterinarians in case of an emergency as provided in W.S. 11-18-103(a)(ii). The state veterinarian may request the assistance of licensed veterinarians from other states as needed in emergency situations without requiring Wyoming licensure.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.3; 1997, ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 97, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

added (a)(xii) and (a)(xiii).

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-30-204.
Board of veterinary medicine.

A Wyoming board of veterinary medicine shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the consent of the senate, and shall consist of five (5) members who shall hold office for a term of six (6) years. Four (4) members shall be licensed veterinarians, one (1) member shall be a consumer of veterinary services. Members of the state board of veterinary examiners previously appointed under this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

] shall continue as members of the board until the expiration of the term for which they were appointed. Initial appointments to the board may be for less than six (6) years so that the terms of not more than two (2) members shall expire in any one (1) biennium. Whenever the occasion arises for an appointment of a licensed veterinarian under this section the Wyoming Veterinary Medical Association shall nominate three (3) or more qualified persons and forward the nominations to the governor at least thirty (30) days prior to the convening date of the senate. Vacancies due to death, resignation or removal shall be filled by appointment by the governor in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

upon nominations being made as otherwise provided in this section for appointment. No person shall serve two (2) consecutive six (6) year terms, but a person appointed for a term of fewer than six (6) years, or to fill a vacancy, may succeed himself. Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be made in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

Any member of the board who is required to be a licensed veterinarian shall be qualified to serve as a member of the board if he is a graduate of a college of veterinary medicine, a resident of this state, and has been licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state for the five (5) years immediately preceding the time of his appointment. No person may serve on the board who is, or was during the two (2) years immediately preceding his appointment, a member of the faculty, trustees or advisory board of a college of veterinary medicine.

The governor may remove any board member from office as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Immediately and before entering upon the duties of said office, the members of the board shall take the constitutional oath of office and shall file the same in the office of the secretary of state; and there shall thereupon be issued to said members certificates of their appointments.

Each member of the board shall receive compensation from the veterinary medicine account for each day actually spent in the performance of his official board duties at the salary rate provided in W.S. 28-5-101(d) and per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii).

The board shall meet at least once each year at the time and place fixed by rule of the board. Other necessary meetings may be called by the president of the board by giving notice as may be required by rule. Except as otherwise provided, a majority of the board, including one (1) officer, constitutes a quorum. Meetings shall be open and public except that the board may meet in closed session to prepare, approve, administer or grade examinations, or to deliberate the qualification of an applicant for license, or the disposition of a proceeding to discipline a licensed veterinarian. The board shall adopt a seal which shall be affixed to all licenses issued by the board and to other papers requiring the same.

At the annual meeting the board shall organize by electing from its membership a president and vice-president and such other officers as may be prescribed by rules. Officers of the board shall serve for terms of one (1) year and until successors are elected, without limitation on the number of terms an officer may serve. The president shall serve as chairman at the board meetings, except that in his absence the vice-president shall serve as chairman. The state veterinarian shall be ex officio member of the board and shall receive no compensation, except that he is entitled to the normal travel expenses allowed to state employees.

The board shall keep permanent accounts and records of all receipts and disbursements by the board and minutes of all board proceedings, including the disposition of all applications for licenses, and keep a register of all persons currently licensed by the board. The board shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor and the Wyoming Veterinary Medical Association as to the transactions of the board. In all court actions or proceedings pertaining to this act, a transcript of any record or any part thereof, which is certified to be a true copy by the board, shall be entitled to admission in evidence.

All board records shall be open to public inspection during regular office hours of the board; except, information received by the board through inspection and investigations involving the question of licensure shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except as may be judicially required.

All money shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit the money to a separate account. All expenses of the board and all expenses incurred in connection with the administration of this act shall be paid from the account by requisition signed by a person designated by the board in a manner provided by law for payment of other state expenses. The account shall be a continuing account and shall not be subject to reversion to the state’s general fund.

The board is empowered to:

Examine and determine the qualifications and fitness of applicants for a license to practice veterinary medicine in the state;

Issue, renew, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses and temporary permits to practice veterinary medicine in the state or otherwise discipline licensed veterinarians consistent with the provisions of the act and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder, provided that any denial, suspension or revocation of a license shall be preceded by notice and an opportunity for a hearing;

Regulate artificial insemination of animals by establishing standards of practice by consultation with approved schools of artificial insemination and issue permits to persons found qualified by the board;

Establish and publish annually a schedule of fees for licensing and registration of veterinarians and the issuance of permits;

Conduct investigations for the purpose of discovering violations of this act;

Hold hearings on all matters properly brought before the board;

Employ full-time or part-time professional, clerical or special personnel necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act and purchase or rent necessary office space, equipment and supplies;

Employ personnel and incur expenses as may be necessary for the promotion of education and standards of veterinary medicine through institutes, conferences, educational programs or any other means as may result in improved services;

Accept any federal, state, county, city or private funds, grants or appropriations which shall be used to award scholarships, fellowships or assistantships to qualified persons to study veterinary medicine in an approved school. The funds shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a separate account. The funds shall be paid out upon request of the board as provided by law. The above mentioned awards shall be granted under rules adopted by the board;

Appoint from its own membership one (1) or more members to act as representatives of the board at any meeting within or without the state where such representation is deemed desirable;

Bring proceedings in the courts for the enforcement of this act or any regulations made pursuant thereto;

Adopt, amend, or repeal all rules necessary for its government and all regulations necessary to carry into effect the provision of this act including the establishment and publication of standards of professional conduct for the practice of veterinary medicine;

Regulate the transplanting of embryos in animals by establishing standards of practice and issue permits to persons found qualified by the board;

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 127, § 3.

The powers enumerated are granted for the purpose of enabling the board to supervise effectively the practice of veterinary medicine and are to be construed liberally to accomplish this objective. In the exercise of its powers, the board shall be governed by the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.4; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1997, ch. 95, § 1; ch. 114, § 1; 2003, ch. 182, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2011, ch. 97, § 1; 2013 ch. 127, § 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20, 21, Wyo. Const.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (k) and for “an account within the trust and agency fund” (m)(ix).

The 2011 amendment,

rewrote (e), increasing board member salaries; rewrote (g) through (k), eliminating the function of secretary-treasurer of the board of veterinary medicine; and made relating and stylistic changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (m)(xiv), which read: “Make recommendations regarding members of the animal euthanasia technicians certification board to the governor pursuant to W.S. 33-30-217(a).”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (e), substituted “provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowed to state employees.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2013, ch. 127, § 4,
directs: “Any amount in the account created under
W.S. 33-30-219(c) repealed by this act shall, on the effective date of this act, be
transferred to the account created under
W.S. 33-30-204(k).”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(ix) and notes thereto.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-30-205.
Veterinarians presently licensed.

Any person holding a valid license to practice veterinary medicine in this state on the date when this act becomes effective shall be recognized as a licensed veterinarian and shall be entitled to retain this status so long as he complies with the provisions of this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

], including annual renewal of license.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.5.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1967, ch. 37, carried no provision as to its effective date, but was enacted at a session that adjourned on February 18, 1967. See §

8-1-108

.

§ 33-30-206.
Application for license; fee; determination of qualifications.

Any person desiring a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state shall make written application to the board. The application shall show that the applicant is an adult, subscribes to and will uphold the principles incorporated in the constitution of the United States, is a graduate of a college of veterinary medicine, has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of veterinary medicine or to the ability to practice veterinary medicine, is of good physical and mental health, and shall provide such other information and proof as the board may require by rule. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount established and published by the board.

If the board determines that the applicant possesses the proper qualifications, it shall admit the applicant to the next examination, or if the applicant is eligible for a license without examination under W.S.

33-30-208

, the board may forthwith grant him a license. If an applicant is found not qualified to take the examination or does not qualify for a license without examination, the board shall immediately notify the applicant in writing of such finding and the grounds therefor. A licensee whose license is revoked or an applicant found unqualified shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing to be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Any applicant who is found not qualified shall be allowed the return of his application fee.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.6; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1991, ch. 112, § 1; 2011, ch. 97, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b), deleted “secretary-treasurer of the” before “board shall immediately.”

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “is a graduate of a college of veterinary medicine, has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of veterinary medicine or to the ability to practice veterinary medicine, is of good physical and mental health” for “a graduate of a college of veterinary medicine, a person of good moral character, physical and mental health” following “United States.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-30-207.
Examinations generally.

The board shall hold at least one (1) examination of applicants for license to practice veterinary medicine during each year and may hold such additional examinations as are necessary.

The preparation, administration, and grading of examinations shall be governed by rules prescribed by the board. Examinations shall be designed to test the examinee’s knowledge of and proficiency in the subjects and techniques commonly taught in colleges of veterinary medicine. To pass the examination, the examinee must demonstrate scientific and practical knowledge of the highest competency to prove himself qualified to practice veterinary medicine in the judgment of the board. All examinees shall be tested by a written examination, supplemented by such oral interviews and practical demonstrations as the board may deem necessary. The board may adopt and use the examination prepared by the national board of veterinary examiners.

After each examination the board shall notify each examinee of the result of his examination, and the board shall issue licenses to the persons successfully completing the examination. The board shall record the new licenses and issue certificates of registration to the new licensees. Any person failing an examination shall be admitted to any subsequent examination on payment of the application fee.

Each licensee shall be entitled to exercise all the rights and privileges of a doctor of veterinary medicine; provided, however, any person practicing veterinary medicine shall be governed by the laws of this state and the rules adopted by the board.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.7; 2011, ch. 97, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (c), substituted “board' for “secretary-treasurer.”

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

§ 33-30-208.
When examination not required.

The board may, but is not required to, issue a license without a written examination to a qualified applicant who:

Has for the five (5) years next prior to filing his application been a practicing veterinarian licensed in a state, territory, or district of the United States having license requirements at the time the applicant was first licensed which were substantially equivalent to the requirements of this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

], and who has the recommendation for Wyoming licensure by the examining board of his state of residence;

Has within the three (3) years next prior to filing his application successfully completed the examination conducted by the national board of veterinary examiners.

At its discretion, the board may orally or practically examine any person qualifying for licensing under this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.8.

§ 33-30-209.
Temporary permits.

The board may issue without examination a temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine in this state to a qualified applicant for license pending examination, provided that such temporary permit shall expire the day after the notice of results of the first examination given after the permit is issued.

A temporary permit may be summarily revoked by majority vote of the board without a hearing.

The board is under no obligation to issue a second temporary permit under this provision but may do so if circumstances warrant such issuance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.9.

§ 33-30-210.
Display and exhibition of license; other licenses not required.

Each person to whom a license is issued shall keep such license conspicuously displayed in his office, place of business or place of employment, and shall, whenever required, exhibit said license to any member or authorized representative of the board.

No state, county, or city occupational license shall be required to practice veterinary medicine when a veterinarian shall present to the proper authority a valid current license issued by the board.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.10.

§ 33-30-211.
Expiration and renewal of licenses; fees; veterinarians on active duty with armed services; duplicate licenses; continuing education.

All licenses shall expire annually on December 31 of each year and shall be renewed by registration with the board and payment of the registration renewal fee established and published by the board. On December 1 of each year, the board shall mail a notice to each licensed veterinarian that his license will expire on December 31 and provide him with a form for reregistration. The board shall issue annual certificates of registration to all persons registering under this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

].

Any person who shall practice veterinary medicine after the expiration of his license and willfully or by neglect fail to renew such license shall be practicing in violation of this act. The board may, by rule establish a grace period for license renewal not to exceed sixty (60) days and establish a late fee for license renewal which shall not exceed the annual renewal fee. At the discretion of the board, any person not practicing in the state may renew an expired license within five (5) years of the date of its expiration by making written application for renewal and paying the current renewal fee plus a late fee and all delinquent renewal fees. After five (5) years have elapsed since the date of the expiration, a license may not be renewed, but the holder must make application for a new license.

The board may by rule waive the payment of the registration renewal fee of a licensed veterinarian during the period when he is on active duty with any branch of the armed services of the United States, not to exceed the longer of three (3) years or the duration of a national emergency.

The board shall issue a duplicate license to replace one that has been lost or otherwise rendered unusable upon payment of a fee set by rule of the board. Such duplicate license shall be so designated.

The renewal under subsection (a) of this section shall be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the board of compliance with this chapter and completion of continuing education activities as established by rules and regulations of the board. The board shall require three (3) hours of continuing education related to the responsible prescribing of controlled substances every two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.11; 2011, ch. 97, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), substituted “board” for “secretary-treasurer”; in (b), provided for a license renewal grace period and late fee; and added (e).

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b) made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (e), added the last sentence.

§ 33-30-212.
Denial, suspension and revocation of licenses.

Upon written complaint sworn to by any person, the board may after a fair hearing and by a concurrence of all members, deny, revoke or suspend for a certain time the license of, or reprimand, any applicant or licensed veterinarian who upon proof to the satisfaction of the board:

Has employed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in obtaining a license;

Has been adjudicated insane;

Has habitually used drugs or intoxicants;

Has been convicted of a felony that relates to the practice of veterinary medicine or to the ability to practice veterinary medicine or has entered a plea of nolo contendere upon being charged with commission of such a felony;

Has been convicted of a violation of any federal or state law relating to narcotic drugs;

Has used advertising or solicitation deemed unprofessional by the board;

Has been guilty of gross malpractice or gross neglect in the practice of veterinary medicine which has endangered the health or life of any person or animal;

Has had professional association with or employed any person practicing veterinary medicine unlawfully;

Has committed acts of fraud or dishonesty; especially in the application or reporting of any test for disease in animals;

Has failed to report, if required by law, or made false report of, any contagious or infectious disease;

Has been guilty of gross negligence in the inspection of foodstuffs or the issuance of health certificate, inspection certificate or vaccination certificate or other form used in the practice of veterinary medicine contributing to the dissemination of animal disease, transportation of diseased animals, or the sale of products of animal origin not fit for human consumption;

Has had a license to practice veterinary medicine by another state, territory, or district of the United States revoked or suspended on grounds other than nonpayment of registration fee;

Has been guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined in regulations adopted by the board;

Has been guilty of willful or repeated violation of any provision of this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

];

Has willfully failed to display a license to practice veterinary medicine in the state of Wyoming;

Has failed to keep the equipment and premises of the business establishment in a clean and sanitary condition as established by rules of the board;

Has refused to permit the board to inspect the business premises of the licensee during regular business hours;

Has been convicted of a charge of cruelty to animals;

Has failed to answer to the board, when so requested in writing, in regard to information relating to any of the violations listed under this section.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.12; Laws 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iv), substituted “that relates
to the practice of veterinary medicine or to the ability to practice
veterinary medicine” for “involving moral turpitude”
following “convicted of a felony.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Cross references. —

For Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

Cited

in

Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 33-30-213.
Reinstatement of suspended or revoked licenses.

Any person whose license is suspended or revoked may, at the discretion of the board, be relicensed or reinstated at any time without an examination by majority vote of the board on written application made to the board showing cause justifying relicensing or reinstatement.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.13.

§ 33-30-214.
Penalty for violation; injunction.

Any person who violates W.S.

33-30-101

through

33-30-215

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each act of such unlawful practice shall constitute a distinct and separate offense.

The board or any citizen of this state may bring an action to enjoin any person from practicing veterinary medicine without a currently valid license or temporary permit. If the court finds that the person is violating or is threatening to violate this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

], it shall enter an injunction restraining him from such unlawful acts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.14; 2011, ch. 97, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), substituted “violates W.S.

33-30-101

through

33-30-215

is” for “shall practice veterinary medicine without a currently valid license or temporary permit shall be,” and increased penalties.

Laws 2011, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

§ 33-30-215.
Disposition of unclaimed animals in custody of veterinarians; notice to owner; liability of veterinarians; “abandoned animals”.

Any animal placed in the custody of a licensed veterinarian for treatment, boarding, or other care, which shall be unclaimed by its owner or his agent for a period of more than ten (10) days after written notice is given to the owner or his agent at his last known address, shall be deemed to be abandoned and may be turned over to the custody of the nearest humane society or dog pound in the area for the disposal as such custodian may deem proper.

The giving of notice to the owner, or the agent of the owner, of such animal by the licensed veterinarian, as provided in the foregoing paragraph, shall relieve the licensed veterinarian and any custodian to whom such animal may be given of any further liability for disposal; it is further provided that such procedure by the licensed veterinarian shall not constitute grounds for disciplinary procedure under this act [§§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

].

For the purpose of this act the term “abandoned” shall mean to forsake entirely, or to neglect or refuse to provide or perform the legal obligations for care and support of an animal by its owner, or his agent; such abandonment shall constitute the relinquishment of all rights and claim by the owner to such animal.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 33-383.15.

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1967, ch. 37, § 17, provides “This act shall not affect the rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date.”

§ 33-30-223.
Certificate required.

No person shall practice as an animal euthanasia technician unless a permit is obtained as provided in W.S.

33-30-224

. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to apply to any employee of the Wyoming game and fish department who is euthanizing wildlife in the course of his duties.

An animal euthanasia technician shall register with the Wyoming board of pharmacy to purchase, possess and administer drugs labeled by the manufacturer for the purpose of euthanizing animals, excluding Schedule I drugs as defined in W.S.

35-7-1013

and

35-7-1014

.

If at any time there is a change in employment or sponsorship of an animal euthanasia technician by a law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency shall immediately notify the board of the change. Changes include transfer to another division or part of the law enforcement agency as well as firing, termination or other release of employment or sponsorship by the law enforcement agency. The board shall adopt rules relating to changes in employment or sponsorship by law enforcement agencies for the purposes of this section.

History.

2013 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 127, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-30-224.
Requirements for certification.

The board may issue a certificate as an animal euthanasia technician to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions that relate to the practice of animal euthanasia or to the ability to practice as an animal euthanasia technician;

The applicant has no misdemeanor convictions that relate to the practice of animal euthanasia or to the ability to practice as an animal euthanasia technician and no criminal violations relating to cruelty to animals or animal neglect;

The applicant is employed or sponsored by a law enforcement agency;

The applicant has completed an animal euthanasia training and testing program approved or developed by the board.

The board may, in its sole discretion, require an applicant to appear before the board.

Upon examination of all credentials the board may consider the credentials adequate evidence of professional competence and issue a certificate.

Persons certified as an animal euthanasia technician in this state as of July 1, 2013 are presumed to have met all requirements for certification under this section and are eligible for renewal of certification in accordance with the provisions of this section.

History.

2013 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii), added “that relate to the practice of animal euthanasia or to the ability to practice as an animal euthanasia technician” at the end; and, in (a)(iii), substituted “that relate to the practice of animal euthanasia or to the ability to practice as an animal euthanasia technician” for “involving moral turpitude.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 127, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.